Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-2722
Applicability.

The Nebraska Uniform Transfers to Minors Act applies to a transfer within the scope of section 43-2703 made after July 15, 1992, if:

(1) The transfer purports to have been made under the Nebraska Uniform Gifts to Minors Act or sections 43-2301 to 43-2305 as such act or sections existed on July 15, 1992; or

(2) The instrument by which the transfer purports to have been made uses in substance the designation as custodian under the Uniform Gifts to Minors Act of any other state or as custodian under the Uniform Transfers to Minors Act of any other state, and the application of the Nebraska Uniform Transfers to Minors Act is necessary to validate the transfer.

Laws 1992, LB 907, § 22.